test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-paarr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - paarr â-stem: # Noun 'pari' - full paradigm
     paarr+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: paarr
     paarr+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: paar
     paarr+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: paar
     paarr+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: paʹrre
     paarr+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: paarâst
     paarr+N+Sg+Com+Indef: paarin
     paarr+N+Ess+Indef: paarrân
     paarr+N+Par+Indef: paarrâd
     paarr+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [paartaa, paartää]
     paarr+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: paar
     paarr+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: paari
     paarr+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: paarid
     paarr+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: paarid
     paarr+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: paarin
     paarr+N+Pl+Com+Indef: paarivuiʹm
     paarr+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [paaritaa, paaritää]
     paarr+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: paarâž
